Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.12.020

Meetings, where held—Corporate records.

All meetings of the stockholders of any bank, except organization meetings and meetings held with the consent of all stockholders, must be held in the county in which the head office or any branch of the corporation is located. Meetings of the directors of any bank may be held either within or without this state. Every such corporation shall keep records in which shall be recorded the names and residences of the stockholders thereof, the number of shares held by each, and also the transfers of stock, showing the time when made, the number of shares and by whom transferred. In all actions, suits and proceedings, said records shall be prima facie proof of the facts shown therein. All of the corporate books, including the certificate book, stockholders' ledger and minute book or a copy thereof shall be kept at the corporation's principal place of business. Any books, record, and minutes may be in written form or any other form capable of being converted to written form within a reasonable time.

[ 2014 c 37 s 171; 1994 c 256 s 55; 1986 c 279 s 31; 1969 c 136 s 9; 1955 c 33 s 30.12.020. Prior: 1927 c 179 s 1; 1917 c 80 s 31; RRS s 3238. Formerly RCW 30.12.020.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.